District of Columbia statutes.
7-2231.06

Large building security.

(a)

In consultation with organizations representing property owners, property managers, and building operators and managers, the Director shall develop guidance for building operators and managers to enhance the security of large commercial and residential buildings.

(b)

In consultation with the Director of the Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs and organizations representing property owners, property managers, and building operators and managers, the Director shall occasionally review the building code to determine potential changes that could improve building security.

Aug. 11, 1950, 64 Stat. 440, ch. 686, § 206
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-262, § 101(e), 54 DCR 794